it: certificazione della lega di cornhole: Certificato ACA; Stampigliato ACL Pro; Approvato ACO; Con licenza NCAA; Non certificato; Ufficiale WSOC; Altro
de: Cornhole-Liga-Zertifizierung: ACA-zertifiziert; Mit ACL-Pro-Stempel; ACO-zugelassen; NCAA-lizenziert; Nicht zertifiziert; WSOC-offiziell; Andere
pt-BR: Certificação da liga de cornhole: Com certificado ACA; Com selo ACL Pro; Aprovado pela ACO; Licenciado pela NCAA; Sem certificado; Oficial da WSOC; Outros
ko: 콘홀 리그 인증: ACA 인증; ACL Pro 스탬프; ACO 승인; NCAA 라이선스; 미인증; WSOC 공식; 기타
lt-LT: Cornhole lygos sertifikavimas: Sertifikuota ACA; Su ACL Pro antspaudu; Patvirtinta ACO; Licencijuota NCAA; Nesertifikuota; Oficialus WSOC; Kita
el: Πιστοποίηση για χρήση σε επίσημες διοργανώσεις cornhole: Πιστοποίηση ACA; Σφραγίδα ACL Pro; Εγκεκριμένο από ACO; Με άδεια NCAA; Χωρίς πιστοποίηση; Επίσημο WSOC; Άλλο
fi: Cornhole-liigan sertifiointi: ACA-sertifioitu; ACL Pro -leimattu; ACO-hyväksytty; NCAA-lisensoitu; Sertifioimaton; Virallinen WSOC; Muu
hu: Cornhole liga tanúsítványa: ACA tanúsított; ACL Pro jóváhagyott; ACO jóváhagyott; NCAA licencelt; Nem tanúsított; Hivatalos WSOC; Egyéb
zh-TW: Cornhole 聯賽認證: ACA 認證; ACL 職業印章; ACO 批准; NCAA 授權; 未認證; WSOC 官方; 其他
nb: Cornhole-ligasertifisering: ACA-sertifisert; ACL Pro-stemplet; ACO-godkjent; NCAA-lisensiert; Ikke sertifisert; WSOC-offisiell; Annet
pl: Certyfikacja ligi cornhole: Certyfikat ACA; Pieczęć ACL Pro; Zatwierdzony przez ACO; Licencja NCAA; Brak certyfikatu; Oficjalny WSOC; Inny
en: Cornhole league certification: ACA Certified; ACL Pro Stamped; ACO Approved; NCAA Licensed; Uncertified; WSOC Official; Other
tr: Cornhole ligi sertifikası: ACA sertifikalı; ACL Pro damgalı; ACO onaylı; NCAA lisanslı; Sertifikasız; WSOC resmi; Diğer
th: การรับรองโดยลีกคอร์นโฮล: รับรองโดย ACA; ประทับตรา ACL Pro; อนุมัติโดย ACO; ได้รับอนุญาตจาก NCAA; ไม่ได้รับการรับรอง; เป็นทางการโดย WSOC; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Сертификация за cornhole лига: Сертифицирани от ACA; С печат ACL Pro; Одобрени от ACO; Лицензирани от NCAA; Несертифицирани; Официално за WSOC; Други
ro-RO: Certificare în liga cornhole: Certificat ACA; Marcat ACL Pro; Aprobat ACO; Licențiat NCAA; Necertificat; Oficial WSOC; Altele
zh-CN: 沙包联赛认证: ACA 认证; ACL Pro 认证标志; ACO 批准; NCAA 授权; 未认证; WSOC 官方; 其他
nl: Cornhole-competitiecertificering: ACA-gecertificeerd; Voorzien van ACL Pro-stempel; ACO-goedgekeurd; NCAA-gelicentieerd; Niet-gecertificeerd; WSOC-officieel; Overige
sk-SK: Certifikácia ligy Cornhole: Certifikované ACA; Pečať ACL Pro; Schválené ACO; S licenciou NCAA; Bez certifikácie; Oficiálne pre WSOC; Iné
cs: Certifikace Cornhole ligy: Certifikace ACA; Označení ACL Pro; Schváleno ACO; Licence NCAA; Bez certifikace; Oficiální WSOC; Ostatní
fr: Certification de ligue de cornhole: Certifié ACA; Estampillé ACL Pro; Approuvé par l’ACO; Sous licence NCAA; Non certifié; Officiel WSOC; Autre
ja: コーンホールリーグ認定: ACA認証; ACL Pro認定; ACO承認; NCAAライセンス; 未認証; WSOC公式; その他
da: Certificering af cornhole-liga: ACA-certificeret; ACL Pro-stemplet; ACO-godkendt; NCAA-licenseret; Ikke-certificeret; WSOC-officiel; Andet
sv: Cornhole-ligancertifiering: ACA-certifierad; ACL Pro-stämplad; ACO-godkänd; NCAA-licensierad; Ocertifierad; WSOC-officiell; Övrigt
vi: Chứng nhận của giải đấu Cornhole: Được ACA chứng nhận; Chứng nhận ACL Pro; Được ACO phê duyệt; Được NCAA cấp phép; Chưa chứng nhận; Chứng nhận chính thức của WSOC; Khác
hr-HR: Certifikacija Cornhole lige: ACA certifikat; ACL Pro žig; Odobrio ACO; NCAA licencirano; Bez certifikata; Službeni WSOC; Ostalo
es: Certificación de la liga de juego de tiro: Certificación de la ACA; Sello ACL Pro; Aprobación de la ACO; Con licencia de la NCAA; Sin certificación; Oficial de la WSOC; Otro
sl-SI: Certifikacija lige štrbunka: Certifikat ACA; Žig ACL Pro; Odobritev ACO; Licenca NCAA; Brez certifikata; Uradno WSOC; Drugo
pt-PT: Certificação da liga Cornhole: Certificação ACA; Selo ACL Pro; Aprovação ACO; Licença NCAA; Sem certificação; Oficial WSOC; Outro
ru: Сертификация лиги корнхола: Сертификат ACA; Со штампом ACL Pro; Одобрено ACO; Лицензия NCAA; Без сертификации; Официально WSOC; Другое